Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 2

Tobacco Inspectors—Inspections—Violations

43-19-201. Warehouse proprietor may be inspector — Appointment of deputy inspectors — Oath — Bond.

The proprietor of a warehouse, regularly authorized under this chapter, is created an inspector of tobacco, with power to appoint deputy inspectors; but, before any warehouse keeper, who may personally act as inspector, or any deputy who may act as inspector for the warehouse keeper, enters upon the duties of an inspector, that person shall go before the county clerk, and take and subscribe the following oath: “I, , do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will carefully and diligently perform all the duties of an inspector of tobacco, according to law and to the best of my skill and judgment, without fear, favor, affection, malice, or partiality, and that I will not buy nor sell any tobacco inspected and sampled by me, nor accept any interest or profit in or from the purchase or sale of any tobacco inspected and sampled by me. So help me God.”

The person shall enter into bond, with good and sufficient security, to be approved by the county mayor, and payable to the state, in the sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000), conditioned to faithfully and honestly discharge the duties of the office, and that the person will not buy nor sell any tobacco inspected and sampled by that person, nor accept any interest or profit in or from the purchase or sale of any tobacco inspected or sampled by the person.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 8; 1889, ch. 192, § 2; Shan., § 3388; Code 1932, § 6485; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2110; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Contracts to raise and sell farm products, title 43, ch. 15.

Cooperative marketing associations, title 43, ch. 16.

Promotion of leadership in agricultural and home economics programs at post-secondary institutions, title 49, ch. 7, part 7.

Sale of pecans, title 43, ch. 17.

Soybean promotion, title ch. 20.

43-19-202. Duties of proprietor or deputy.

It is the duty of the proprietor or one (1) of the proprietor's regular deputies to:

Inspect the uncasing and breaking of any tobacco for inspection, and examine and classify the tobacco according to law and the proprietor's or deputy's oath of office;

Break each hogshead for inspection, in at least four (4) different places, drawing from each break at least four (4) bundles or hands of tobacco, from different courses or layers, so as to get a fair and just representation of the quality and condition of the tobacco;

Place these bundles together in one (1) sample, stamp with the following seal: “State Tobacco Inspection,” and mark with ink upon the label of the sample the name of the warehouse, the planter's name, the warehouse number of the hogshead and its approximate gross weight, the date of inspection, and the name of the sampler drawing the sample;

Mark “A,” or “Admitted,” all sound, clear, well assorted leaf tobacco, clear of lugs or trash, in good keeping order, and mark “R,” or “Refused,” all lugs or trash, or leaf mixed with lugs or trash, or clean leaf tobacco, if not in good keeping order;

Condemn all hogshead or casks that are insecure, or made of green or unsound timber, and mark, upon the label of the sample, “Cask Condemned”; the cost of putting such hogshead in proper merchantable order shall be charged to the owner of the tobacco;

Refuse to classify, and mark as “Damaged,” expressing on the label the probable amount of damage, every hogshead so damaged that the sample drawn will not show the character and extent of damage;

Refuse to classify, and to mark “Condemned,” any hogshead of tobacco that is falsely and fraudulently packed with intent to deceive, and give full information to the grand jury about such hogshead, from the proprietor's or deputy's books, when called upon to furnish the information;

Superintend the coopering and reweighing; see that each cask is replaced over the same tobacco from which it was taken; and mark the hogshead on both heads with distinct figures, specifying the correct weights;

Carefully enter in a book, to be provided and kept, for that purpose alone, an account of every hogshead of tobacco inspected, stating the planter's name, warehouse number, the gross weight, the tare, the net weight, the price at which it sold, the purchaser's name, and its quality, whether “Admitted” or “Refused”; and

Be personally present, and witness the breaking of any tobacco for inspection, and personally attach the proprietor's or deputy's seal to the sample drawn, and pay all just reclamations on tobacco improperly sampled by the proprietor or deputy.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 9; 1889, ch. 192, § 3; Shan., § 3389; Code 1932, § 6486; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2111.

Cross-References. Deceptive business practices, § 39-14-127.

43-19-203. Reinspection — Making.

Should any planter, or the planter's agent representing the planter, claim that the sample drawn from the planter's tobacco by an inspector does not represent fairly the hogshead from which it was taken, the planter may demand and have that hogshead reinspected.

The tobacco board of trade, where one exists, shall appoint a committee, consisting of two (2) warehousemen and one (1) buyer, who shall resample such tobacco, so as to show, as nearly as may be, the average condition and quality of the hogshead; and upon such sample so drawn by the committee, and the sample drawn by the inspector, the board of trade shall proceed to adjudge, in the same manner and in all respects as reclamations in favor of the buyer are determined, the amount, if any, the hogshead has been undersampled by the inspector, and the amount so adjudged shall be paid by the inspector to the planter.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any planter from guaranteeing the planter's tobacco to come up to the sample drawn by any inspector.

Acts 1889, ch. 192, § 3; Shan., § 3389a; Code 1932, § 6487; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2112.

43-19-204. Responsibility of keeper.

After the tobacco is inspected, coopered, weighed, and numbered, the warehouse keeper becomes responsible to the planter or owner for the weights and proper keeping of the tobacco.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 10; Shan., § 3390; Code 1932, § 6488; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2113.

43-19-205. Conversion of samples or plucking leaves therefrom prohibited — Penalty.

No warehouse keeper, nor anyone in the employment of the warehouse keeper, shall take or convert to that person's own use, or dispose of, any sample of tobacco, but the tobacco shall be delivered to the purchaser, and all loose tobacco shall be neatly returned to the hogshead or other container from which it came, before coopering and weighing.

No person shall willfully or wantonly pluck any leaf or leaves from any sample of tobacco to which the inspector has attached the inspector's seal, either before or after sale.

Any person violating any provision of this section commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 11; 1889, ch. 192, § 4; Shan., § 3390a; mod. Code 1932, § 6489; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2114; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-19-206. Erasure or counterfeiting a misdemeanor.

Any person who erases, or in any way alters or defaces, any letter, mark, number or figure put upon any hogshead or other container by an inspector, or counterfeits the letter, mark, number or figure, previous to the delivery to the purchaser, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 12; Shan., § 3391; mod. Code 1932, § 6490; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2115; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-19-207. Keeper not to sell tobacco until inspection — Penalty.

No warehouse keeper shall sell publicly any sample of tobacco that has not been regularly inspected under this chapter, under a penalty of five dollars ($5.00) for each hogshead so sold, to be recovered by any person suing for that amount.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 13; Shan., § 3392; Code 1932, § 6491; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2116.

43-19-208. Copy of sample cards with “Inspected” thereon.

Any warehouse keeper called upon to inspect a lot of tobacco shall make a copy of the original sample card, and write on it, in plain letters, “Inspected,” adding the date.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 14; Shan., § 3393; Code 1932, § 6492; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2117.

43-19-209. Warehouseman not to sell or buy.

No proprietor of a warehouse shall sell any tobacco that has been directly or indirectly bought by that person, or on that person's account, nor directly or indirectly purchase on that person's own account any tobacco stored in that person's warehouse. This section is not to be construed as referring to the sale of crops of tobacco raised by the proprietor or any of the proprietor's agents or employees.

No proprietor of a warehouse, nor any deputy of a proprietor, who acts as inspector of tobacco, shall buy or sell any tobacco inspected and sampled by the proprietor or deputy, nor accept any interest or profit in or from the purchase or sale of any tobacco inspected and sampled by that person.

Any person violating this section shall forfeit fifty dollars ($50.00) for each hogshead so purchased or sold, or in which such interest or profit was accepted, one half (½) to the state, the other one half (½) to the informer.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 15; 1889, ch. 192, § 5; Shan., § 3394; Code 1932, § 6493; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2118.

43-19-210. Accepting gratuity or reward — Penalty.

If any warehouse keeper accepts, directly or indirectly, any gratuity or reward for anything by that person done or omitted in the discharge of that person's official duties, that person shall forfeit two hundred dollars ($200) to the state, and, moreover, the warehouse keeper commits a Class C misdemeanor. The warehouse keeper shall also forfeit the office, and be forever afterward disqualified from holding the office of tobacco inspector.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 16; impl. am. Acts 1877, ch. 109, § 1; Shan., § 3395; mod. Code 1932, § 6494; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2119; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-19-211. Derelictions to be reported to county clerk.

Any planter or person shall inform the county clerk of any dereliction of duty on the part of the warehouse keeper.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 17; Shan., § 3396; Code 1932, § 6495; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2120.

43-19-212. Fraudulent packing or “nesting” a misdemeanor — Penalty.

Any person who fraudulently packs or “nests” a hogshead of tobacco with intent to deceive and obtain by the deception more than its true value commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 18; Shan., § 3397; Code 1932, § 6496; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2121; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Deceptive business practices, § 39-14-127.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-19-213. Description of best hogshead to be posted in warehouse.

The warehouse keeper shall keep posted in some conspicuous place in the warehouse a description of the hogsheads or casks, length, measurement, etc., best suited to contain tobacco for market.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 19; Shan., § 3398; Code 1932, § 6497; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2122.

43-19-214. Fees and commissions of warehousemen.

The compensation of warehouse keepers for receiving, storing, inspecting, coopering, and selling tobacco shall be as follows, to wit:

To be paid by the seller, two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50), and one percent (1%) commission on proceeds of sale;

To be paid by buyer, one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50), and for storage after sale, after the first thirty (30) days, for each month or part of a month, twenty-five cents (25¢).

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 20; 1889, ch. 192, § 6; Shan., § 3399; Code 1932, § 6498; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2123.

43-19-215. Extortion a misdemeanor.

Any warehouse keeper who charges more than is allowed in § 43-19-214 commits a Class C misdemeanor, and is also liable to a penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) to the planter or person overcharged, recoverable before any judge of a court of general sessions.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 21; Shan., § 3400; Code 1932, § 6499; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2124; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-19-216. Auction bid may be refused.

Any planter, or other owner of tobacco sold at auction, may, by paying the fees, refuse at the time to take the price at which it is cried off.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 22; Shan., § 3401; Code 1932, § 6500; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2125.

43-19-217. Warehouseman's lien for fees and charges.

A lien is given to the proprietor of the warehouse on all tobacco and proceeds for fees and charges on the tobacco and proceeds.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 22; Shan., § 3402; Code 1932, § 6501; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2126.

43-19-218. Selling or shipping without inspection not prohibited.

No planter or person is prohibited from selling tobacco at private sale, with or without inspection, if such person chooses so to do, nor compelled to have tobacco, though stored in a public or authorized warehouse, inspected; but the person may sell or ship it without inspection.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 65, § 23; impl. am. Acts 1877, ch. 109, § 1; Shan., § 3403; Code 1932, § 6502; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2127.